Utah statutes.
36-2-1.   In-session employees of Legislature enumerated.
The in-session employees of the Legislature shall consist of a secretary of
the Senate and a chief clerk of the House, a minute clerk of the Senate and a
minute clerk of the House, a docket clerk of the Senate and a docket clerk of
the House, a reading clerk of the Senate and a reading clerk of the House, and
such other assistants as may be found necessary.
